Illinois, session 104th, SB3558.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 20-10 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/20-10)7    (Text of Section from P.A. 96-159, 96-588, 97-96, 97-895, 898-1076, 99-906, 100-43, 101-31, 101-657, 102-29, 103-558, and 9103-564)10    Sec. 20-10. Competitive sealed bidding; reverse auction. 11    (a) Conditions for use. All contracts shall be awarded by 12competitive sealed bidding except as otherwise provided in 13Section 20-5.14    (b) Invitation for bids. An invitation for bids shall be 15issued and shall include a purchase description and the 16material contractual terms and conditions applicable to the 17procurement.18    (c) Public notice. Public notice of the invitation for 19bids shall be published in the Illinois Procurement Bulletin 20at least 14 calendar days before the date set in the invitation 21for the opening of bids.22    (d) Bid opening. Bids shall be opened publicly or through 23an electronic procurement system in the presence of one or   SB3558- 2 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1more witnesses at the time and place designated in the 2invitation for bids. The name of each bidder, including earned 3and applied bid credit from the Illinois Works Jobs Program 4Act, the amount of each bid, and other relevant information as 5may be specified by rule shall be recorded. After the award of 6the contract, the winning bid and the record of each 7unsuccessful bid shall be open to public inspection.8    (e) Bid acceptance and bid evaluation. Bids shall be 9unconditionally accepted without alteration or correction, 10except as authorized in this Code. Bids shall be evaluated 11based on the requirements set forth in the invitation for 12bids, which may include criteria to determine acceptability 13such as inspection, testing, quality, workmanship, delivery, 14and suitability for a particular purpose. Those criteria that 15will affect the bid price and be considered in evaluation for 16award, such as discounts, transportation costs, and total or 17life cycle costs, shall be objectively measurable. The 18invitation for bids shall set forth the evaluation criteria to 19be used.20    (f) Correction or withdrawal of bids. Correction or 21withdrawal of inadvertently erroneous bids before or after 22award, or cancellation of awards of contracts based on bid 23mistakes, shall be permitted in accordance with rules. After 24bid opening, no changes in bid prices or other provisions of 25bids prejudicial to the interest of the State or fair 26competition shall be permitted. All decisions to permit the   SB3558- 3 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1correction or withdrawal of bids based on bid mistakes shall 2be supported by written determination made by a State 3purchasing officer.4    (g) Award. The contract shall be awarded with reasonable 5promptness by written notice to the lowest responsible and 6responsive bidder whose bid meets the requirements and 7criteria set forth in the invitation for bids, except when a 8State purchasing officer determines it is not in the best 9interest of the State and by written explanation determines 10another bidder shall receive the award. The explanation shall 11appear in the appropriate volume of the Illinois Procurement 12Bulletin. The written explanation must include:13        (1) a description of the agency's needs; 14        (2) a determination that the anticipated cost will be 15    fair and reasonable;16        (3) a listing of all responsible and responsive 17    bidders; and18        (4) the name of the bidder selected, the total 19    contract price, and the reasons for selecting that bidder.20    Each chief procurement officer may adopt guidelines to 21implement the requirements of this subsection (g).22    The written explanation shall be filed with the 23Legislative Audit Commission, and the Commission on Equity and 24Inclusion, and the Procurement Policy Board, and be made 25available for inspection by the public, within 14 calendar 26days after the agency's decision to award the contract.  SB3558- 4 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1    (g-5) Failed bid notice. In addition to the requirements 2of subsection (g), if a bidder has failed to be awarded a 3contract after 4 consecutive bids to provide the same services 4to the Department of Transportation, the Capital Development 5Board, or the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority, the 6applicable agency shall, in writing, detail why each of the 4 7bids was not awarded to the bidder. The applicable agency 8shall submit by certified copy to the bidder the reason or 9reasons why each of the 4 bids was not awarded to the bidder. 10The agency shall submit that certified copy to the bidder 11within the same calendar quarter in which the fourth bid was 12rejected. This subsection does not apply if information 13pertaining to a failed bid was previously disclosed to a 14bidder by electronic means. If any agency chooses to provide 15information by electronic means, the agency shall have a 16written policy outlining how the agency will reasonably ensure 17the bidder receives the information. For the purposes of this 18subsection, "electronic means" means an email communication 19from the applicable agency to the bidder or a public posting on 20the applicable agency's procurement bulletin. 21    (h) Multi-step sealed bidding. When it is considered 22impracticable to initially prepare a purchase description to 23support an award based on price, an invitation for bids may be 24issued requesting the submission of unpriced offers to be 25followed by an invitation for bids limited to those bidders 26whose offers have been qualified under the criteria set forth   SB3558- 5 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1in the first solicitation.2    (i) Alternative procedures. Notwithstanding any other 3provision of this Act to the contrary, the Director of the 4Illinois Power Agency may create alternative bidding 5procedures to be used in procuring professional services under 6Section 1-56, subsections (a) and (c) of Section 1-75 and 7subsection (d) of Section 1-78 of the Illinois Power Agency 8Act and Section 16-111.5(c) of the Public Utilities Act and to 9procure renewable energy resources under Section 1-56 of the 10Illinois Power Agency Act. These alternative procedures shall 11be set forth together with the other criteria contained in the 12invitation for bids, and shall appear in the appropriate 13volume of the Illinois Procurement Bulletin. 14    (j) Reverse auction. Notwithstanding any other provision 15of this Section and in accordance with rules adopted by the 16chief procurement officer, that chief procurement officer may 17procure supplies or services through a competitive electronic 18auction bidding process after the chief procurement officer 19determines that the use of such a process will be in the best 20interest of the State. The chief procurement officer shall 21publish that determination in his or her next volume of the 22Illinois Procurement Bulletin.23    (k) A contract for supplies may be awarded pursuant to 24this Section using a market basket analysis to evaluate the 25lowest price a vendor can offer for a representative sample of 26supplies. The representative sample of goods must make up at   SB3558- 6 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1least 75% of the resulting contract's total estimated cost, as 2determined by the procuring agency. Contracts awarded using a 3market basket analysis must include an option to add goods 4during the term of the contract. 5    An invitation for bids shall be issued and shall include 6(i) a procurement description, (ii) all contractual terms, 7whenever practical, and (iii) conditions applicable to the 8procurement, including a notice that bids will be received in 9an electronic auction manner.10    Public notice of the invitation for bids shall be given in 11the same manner as provided in subsection (c).12    Bids shall be accepted electronically at the time and in 13the manner designated in the invitation for bids. During the 14auction, a bidder's price shall be disclosed to other bidders. 15Bidders shall have the opportunity to reduce their bid prices 16during the auction. At the conclusion of the auction, the 17record of the bid prices received and the name of each bidder 18shall be open to public inspection.19    After the auction period has terminated, withdrawal of 20bids shall be permitted as provided in subsection (f).21    The contract shall be awarded within 60 calendar days 22after the auction by written notice to the lowest responsible 23bidder, or all bids shall be rejected except as otherwise 24provided in this Code. Extensions of the date for the award may 25be made by mutual written consent of the State purchasing 26officer and the lowest responsible bidder.  SB3558- 7 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1    This subsection does not apply to (i) procurements of 2professional and artistic services, (ii) telecommunications 3services, communication services, and information services, 4and (iii) contracts for construction projects, including 5design professional services. 6(Source: P.A. 102-29, eff. 6-25-21; 103-558, eff. 1-1-24; 7103-564, eff. 11-17-23.) 8    (Text of Section from P.A. 96-159, 96-795, 97-96, 97-895, 998-1076, 99-906, 100-43, 101-31, 101-657, 102-29, 103-558, and 10103-564)11    Sec. 20-10. Competitive sealed bidding; reverse auction. 12    (a) Conditions for use. All contracts shall be awarded by 13competitive sealed bidding except as otherwise provided in 14Section 20-5.15    (b) Invitation for bids. An invitation for bids shall be 16issued and shall include a purchase description and the 17material contractual terms and conditions applicable to the 18procurement.19    (c) Public notice. Public notice of the invitation for 20bids shall be published in the Illinois Procurement Bulletin 21at least 14 calendar days before the date set in the invitation 22for the opening of bids.23    (d) Bid opening. Bids shall be opened publicly or through 24an electronic procurement system in the presence of one or 25more witnesses at the time and place designated in the   SB3558- 8 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1invitation for bids. The name of each bidder, including earned 2and applied bid credit from the Illinois Works Jobs Program 3Act, the amount of each bid, and other relevant information as 4may be specified by rule shall be recorded. After the award of 5the contract, the winning bid and the record of each 6unsuccessful bid shall be open to public inspection.7    (e) Bid acceptance and bid evaluation. Bids shall be 8unconditionally accepted without alteration or correction, 9except as authorized in this Code. Bids shall be evaluated 10based on the requirements set forth in the invitation for 11bids, which may include criteria to determine acceptability 12such as inspection, testing, quality, workmanship, delivery, 13and suitability for a particular purpose. Those criteria that 14will affect the bid price and be considered in evaluation for 15award, such as discounts, transportation costs, and total or 16life cycle costs, shall be objectively measurable. The 17invitation for bids shall set forth the evaluation criteria to 18be used.19    (f) Correction or withdrawal of bids. Correction or 20withdrawal of inadvertently erroneous bids before or after 21award, or cancellation of awards of contracts based on bid 22mistakes, shall be permitted in accordance with rules. After 23bid opening, no changes in bid prices or other provisions of 24bids prejudicial to the interest of the State or fair 25competition shall be permitted. All decisions to permit the 26correction or withdrawal of bids based on bid mistakes shall   SB3558- 9 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1be supported by written determination made by a State 2purchasing officer.3    (g) Award. The contract shall be awarded with reasonable 4promptness by written notice to the lowest responsible and 5responsive bidder whose bid meets the requirements and 6criteria set forth in the invitation for bids, except when a 7State purchasing officer determines it is not in the best 8interest of the State and by written explanation determines 9another bidder shall receive the award. The explanation shall 10appear in the appropriate volume of the Illinois Procurement 11Bulletin. The written explanation must include:12        (1) a description of the agency's needs; 13        (2) a determination that the anticipated cost will be 14    fair and reasonable;15        (3) a listing of all responsible and responsive 16    bidders; and17        (4) the name of the bidder selected, the total 18    contract price, and the reasons for selecting that bidder.19    Each chief procurement officer may adopt guidelines to 20implement the requirements of this subsection (g).21    The written explanation shall be filed with the 22Legislative Audit Commission, and the Commission on Equity and 23Inclusion, and the Procurement Policy Board, and be made 24available for inspection by the public, within 14 days after 25the agency's decision to award the contract.26    (g-5) Failed bid notice. In addition to the requirements   SB3558- 10 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1of subsection (g), if a bidder has failed to be awarded a 2contract after 4 consecutive bids to provide the same services 3to the Department of Transportation, the Capital Development 4Board, or the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority, the 5applicable agency shall, in writing, detail why each of the 4 6bids was not awarded to the bidder. The applicable agency 7shall submit by certified copy to the bidder the reason or 8reasons why each of the 4 bids was not awarded to the bidder. 9The agency shall submit that certified copy to the bidder 10within the same calendar quarter in which the fourth bid was 11rejected. This subsection does not apply if information 12pertaining to a failed bid was previously disclosed to a 13bidder by electronic means. If any agency chooses to provide 14information by electronic means, the agency shall have a 15written policy outlining how the agency will reasonably ensure 16the bidder receives the information. For the purposes of this 17subsection, "electronic means" means an email communication 18from the applicable agency to the bidder or a public posting on 19the applicable agency's procurement bulletin. 20    (h) Multi-step sealed bidding. When it is considered 21impracticable to initially prepare a purchase description to 22support an award based on price, an invitation for bids may be 23issued requesting the submission of unpriced offers to be 24followed by an invitation for bids limited to those bidders 25whose offers have been qualified under the criteria set forth 26in the first solicitation.  SB3558- 11 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1    (i) Alternative procedures. Notwithstanding any other 2provision of this Act to the contrary, the Director of the 3Illinois Power Agency may create alternative bidding 4procedures to be used in procuring professional services under 5subsections (a) and (c) of Section 1-75 and subsection (d) of 6Section 1-78 of the Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 716-111.5(c) of the Public Utilities Act and to procure 8renewable energy resources under Section 1-56 of the Illinois 9Power Agency Act. These alternative procedures shall be set 10forth together with the other criteria contained in the 11invitation for bids, and shall appear in the appropriate 12volume of the Illinois Procurement Bulletin. 13    (j) Reverse auction. Notwithstanding any other provision 14of this Section and in accordance with rules adopted by the 15chief procurement officer, that chief procurement officer may 16procure supplies or services through a competitive electronic 17auction bidding process after the chief procurement officer 18determines that the use of such a process will be in the best 19interest of the State. The chief procurement officer shall 20publish that determination in his or her next volume of the 21Illinois Procurement Bulletin.22    (k) A contract for supplies may be awarded pursuant to 23this Section using a market basket analysis to evaluate the 24lowest price a vendor can offer for a representative sample of 25supplies. The representative sample of goods must make up at 26least 75% of the resulting contract's total estimated cost, as   SB3558- 12 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1determined by the procuring agency. Contracts awarded using a 2market basket analysis must include an option to add goods 3during the term of the contract. 4    An invitation for bids shall be issued and shall include 5(i) a procurement description, (ii) all contractual terms, 6whenever practical, and (iii) conditions applicable to the 7procurement, including a notice that bids will be received in 8an electronic auction manner.9    Public notice of the invitation for bids shall be given in 10the same manner as provided in subsection (c).11    Bids shall be accepted electronically at the time and in 12the manner designated in the invitation for bids. During the 13auction, a bidder's price shall be disclosed to other bidders. 14Bidders shall have the opportunity to reduce their bid prices 15during the auction. At the conclusion of the auction, the 16record of the bid prices received and the name of each bidder 17shall be open to public inspection.18    After the auction period has terminated, withdrawal of 19bids shall be permitted as provided in subsection (f).20    The contract shall be awarded within 60 calendar days 21after the auction by written notice to the lowest responsible 22bidder, or all bids shall be rejected except as otherwise 23provided in this Code. Extensions of the date for the award may 24be made by mutual written consent of the State purchasing 25officer and the lowest responsible bidder.26    This subsection does not apply to (i) procurements of   SB3558- 13 -LRB104 20070 HLH 33521 b1professional and artistic services, (ii) telecommunications 2services, communication services, and information services, 3and (iii) contracts for construction projects, including 4design professional services. 5(Source: P.A. 102-29, eff. 6-25-21; 103-558, eff. 1-1-24; 6103-564, eff. 11-17-23.)